Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2468
Employment of appraisers.

The personal representative may employ a qualified and disinterested appraiser to assist him in ascertaining the fair market value as of the date of the decedent's death of any asset the value of which may be subject to reasonable doubt. Different persons may be employed to appraise different kinds of assets included in the estate. The names and addresses of any appraiser shall be indicated on the inventory with the item or items he appraised.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 146, UPC § 3-707.